Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Penalties

17.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

17.320

to

17.340

shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any public official or employee who knowingly or intentionally makes, or causes to be made, a false return of information to the department shall be punished by confinement in jail for not more than ninety (90) days, by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

Any person who violates KRS 17.545(2) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1988, ch. 345, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 426, § 76, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 308, § 26, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 94, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 38, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 135, § 7, effective March 27, 2017.

17.991.
Penalty for violation of KRS 17.552.

Any person who violates KRS

17.552

shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), and said fine shall be paid to the crime victim compensation fund as established in KRS

49.480

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 155, effective January 15, 1999; 2017 ch. 74, § 55, effective June 29, 2017.